Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for central services and state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $9,861,413.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for self-sufficiency and vocational rehabilitation ser-
vices, is decreased by $5,190,224.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for child welfare, is decreased by $36,477,331.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (4), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for aging and people  with disabilities and
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $10,814,946.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected  or received by the Department of Human Services, for
self-sufficiency and vocational rehabilitation services, is decreased by $946,229.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Human Services, for
child welfare, is decreased by $5,817,188.
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Human Services, for
shared services, is increased by $1,451,699 to allow the department to purchase document
scanners.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  central services and state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $2,041,080.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Department of Human  Services, for self-sufficiency and vocational rehabili-
tation, is decreased by $15,137,677.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare, is  decreased by $22,973,174.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging  and people with disabilities and
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $21,300,076.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health, is decreased by $185,481,431.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (2), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased by $10,157,168.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (5), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for debt service, is decreased by $1,934,265.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 7, chapter 560, Oregon Laws  2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $190,000.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds  for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 2
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for
Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is decreased by $5,807,409.
SECTION 17.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health  Systems, Health Policy and Analytics,
and Public Health, is increased by $167,321,358.
SECTION 18. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 3